California, session 20252026, AB959.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44270 of the Education Code is amended to read:44270. (a) The minimum requirements for the preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services are all of the following:(1) Possession of one of the following:(A) A valid teaching credential requiring the possession of a baccalaureate degree and a professional preparation program including student teaching.(B) A valid designated subjects career technical education, adult education, or special subjects teaching credential, as specified in Section 44260, 44260.1, 44260.2, 44260.3, or 44260.4, provided the candidate also possesses a baccalaureate degree.(C) A valid services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel, health, or clinical or rehabilitative services, as specified in Section 44266, 44267, 44267.5, or 44268, or a valid services credential authorizing service as a teacher librarian, as specified in Section 44269.(D) A valid credential issued under the laws, rules, and regulations in effect on or before December 31, 1971, which authorizes the same areas as in subparagraphs (B) and (C).(2) Completion of a minimum of three years of successful, full-time classroom teaching experience in the public schools, including, but not limited to, service in state- or county-operated schools, or in regionally accredited private schools of equivalent status or three years of experience in the fields of pupil personnel, health, clinical or rehabilitative, or librarian services.(3) Completion of one of the following:(A) An entry-level program of specialized and professional preparation in administrative services approved by the commission.(B) (i) A one-year internship in a program of supervised training in administrative services that is provided by a school district, county office of education, or regionally accredited institution of higher education and that is approved by the commission as satisfying the requirements for the preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services.(ii) The commission shall examine its preservice, professional development, and supervision requirements for the internship programs identified in clause (i) when the commission next considers administrative services credential pathways.(4) Current employment in an administrative position after completion of professional preparation as defined in paragraph (3), whether full or part time, in a public school or regionally accredited private school of equivalent status. The commission shall encourage school districts to consider the recency of preparation or professional growth in school administration as one of the criteria for employment.(b) The preliminary administrative services credential shall be valid for a period of five years from the date of initial employment in an administrative position, whether full or part time, and shall not be renewable.(c) A candidate who completed, by September 30, 1984, the requirements for the administrative services credential in effect on June 30, 1982, is eligible for the credential authorized under those requirements. All other candidates shall satisfy the requirements set forth in this section.SEC. 1.5. Section 44270 of the Education Code is amended to read:44270. (a) The minimum requirements for the preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services are all of the following:(1) Possession of one of the following:(A) A valid teaching credential requiring the possession of a baccalaureate degree and a professional preparation program including student teaching.(B) A valid designated subjects career technical education, adult education, or special subjects teaching credential, as specified in Section 44260, 44260.1, 44260.2, 44260.3, or 44260.4, provided the candidate also possesses a baccalaureate degree.(C) A valid services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel, health, or clinical or rehabilitative services, as specified in Section 44266, 44267, 44267.5, or 44268, or a valid services credential authorizing service as a teacher librarian, as specified in Section 44269.(D) (i) A valid license to practice occupational therapy issued by the California Board of Occupational Therapy or a valid license to practice physical therapy issued by the Physical Therapy Board of California.(ii) A preliminary administrative services credential issued to an individual based, in part, on clause (i) shall not authorize the supervision or evaluation of teachers unless the employing local educational agency determines that the individual possesses additional educational or job experience, leadership training, or an advanced degree that qualifies the individual for the responsibilities of a school administrator.(E) A valid credential issued under the laws, rules, and regulations in effect on or before December 31, 1971, which authorizes the same areas as in subparagraphs (B) and (C).(2) (A) Completion of a minimum of five years of one or more of the following:(i) Successful, full-time classroom teaching experience in the public schools, including, but not limited to, service in state- or county-operated schools, or in regionally accredited private schools of equivalent status.(ii) Successful, full-time experience in the fields of pupil personnel, health, clinical or rehabilitative, or librarian services.(iii) Successful, full-time experience as a school-based occupational therapist or physical therapist.(B) A local educational agency may request a waiver of up to two years of the experience required pursuant to subparagraph (A) for a candidate who (i) completes an administrative services program approved by the commission, (ii) holds an appropriate clear or life prerequisite credential or license, and (iii) has been offered employment in an administrative position by the local educational agency.(3) Completion of one of the following:(A) An entry-level program of specialized and professional preparation in administrative services approved by the commission.(B) (i) A one-year internship in a program of supervised training in administrative services that is provided by a school district, county office of education, or regionally accredited institution of higher education and that is approved by the commission as satisfying the requirements for the preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services.(ii) The commission shall examine its preservice, professional development, and supervision requirements for the internship programs identified in clause (i) when the commission next considers administrative services credential pathways.(4) Current employment in an administrative position after completion of professional preparation as defined in paragraph (3), whether full or part time, in a public school or regionally accredited private school of equivalent status. The commission shall encourage school districts to consider the recency of preparation or professional growth in school administration as one of the criteria for employment.(b) The preliminary administrative services credential shall be valid for a period of five years from the date of initial employment in an administrative position, whether full or part time, and shall not be renewable.(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SEC. 2. Section 1.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 44270 of the Education Code proposed by both this bill and Assembly Bill 1009. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 44270 of the Education Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 1009, in which case Section 1 of this bill shall not become operative.